Massachusetts, session 194th, H5387.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding subsection (b) of section 13 of chapter 4 of the General
Laws, wherever the Town of Westford or Westford public schools or their subdivisions,
committees, boards, commissions or offices are required by statute, ordinance, by-law or judicial
order to publish a legal notice in a newspaper or newspaper of general circulation, such
requirement may be met through 1 or more of the following means: (i) a print newspaper of local
or general circulation; (ii) a newspaper’s website; (iii) websites reporting local news and opinion
which satisfy all criteria for digital publication as set forth in said subsection (c) of said section
13 of said chapter 4; (iv) a statewide website that may be maintained as a repository for such
notices; or (v) a town-wide website that may be maintained as a repository for such notices.
SECTION 2. Nothing set forth in this act shall be construed to alter or amend the time or
timing of publication of legal notices set forth in the General Laws.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1